North Dakota, session 69, HB1456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Certified chaplains - School district policy - Requirements.
1. As used in this section, "certified chaplain" means a chaplain certified by a national or
state chaplaincy organization or ecclesiastically endorsed by a religious organization.
2. A school district may employ or accept as a volunteer a certified chaplain to provide
support, services, and programs for a student, staff member, or legal guardian of a
student as authorized by the board of a school district.
3. A certified chaplain employed or volunteering under this section is not required to be
licensed by the education standards and practices board.
4. The board of a school district shall obtain a criminal history record check from the
bureau of criminal investigation for each individual hired or volunteering under this
section. All costs associated with a background check are the responsibility of the
board under section 12 - 60 - 24 .
5. A school district may not employ or accept as a volunteer under this section an
individual who is required to register under section 12.1 - 32 - 15 .
6. A cause of action does not arise against a certified chaplain for an action taken or
statement made while providing support, services, or programs for a student, staff
member, or legal guardian of a student, unless the action or statement was
Page No. 1 25.0431.04000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
maliciously, willfully, and deliberately intended to cause harm to, harass, or intimidate
an individual seeking the support, services, or programs provided by the certified
chaplain.
Page No. 2 25.0431.04000